North Dakota statutes. TITLE 37 Military
CHAPTER 37-10 Armories

37-10-01.
Adjutant general to provide national guard facilities for units.

The adjutant general shall provide adequate facilities for each unit of the North Dakota national guard. All national guard facilities are under the exclusive control of the adjutant general or any officer designated by the adjutant general.

Source:

S.L. 1891, ch. 86, § 63; R.C. 1895, § 1419; S.L. 1899, ch. 112, § 1; R.C. 1899, § 1419; S.L. 1903, ch. 20, § 1; 1903, ch. 22, § 1; 1905, ch. 14, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 1781; S.L. 1923, ch. 243, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 2416a; S.L. 1941, ch. 221, § 71; R.C. 1943, § 37-1001; S.L. 1979, ch. 390, § 2.

37-10-02.
Board of armory supervisors — Appointment — Meetings. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 343, § 8.

37-10-03.
Adjutant general to supervise national guard facilities.

The adjutant general shall fix for each unit of the national guard, within the limits of legislative appropriations, the maintenance and rent allowance to be paid by this state, shall provide for the acquisition and maintenance of national guard facilities, and may lease property for national guard facilities, but no lease may exceed fifty years.

Source:

S.L. 1903, ch. 48, § 2; R.C. 1905, § 1789; S.L. 1907, ch. 174, § 1; 1909, ch. 165, § 66; C.L. 1913, § 2412; S.L. 1935, ch. 213, § 2; 1941, ch. 221, § 70; R.C. 1943, § 37-1003; S.L. 1951, ch. 225, § 1; 1953, ch. 223, § 8; 1957 Supp., § 37-1003; S.L. 1971, ch. 343, § 1; 1979, ch. 390, § 3.

37-10-03.1.
Sale of portions of Fraine Barracks. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 379, § 2.

37-10-03.2.
Exchange, sale, and lease of military lands.

The adjutant general may exchange with or sell to any person lands owned by the state and used for military purposes, and may purchase, within funds available, parcels of land necessary for the construction of armories or the expansion of present military installations in the state. Sales must be made under the provisions of sections 54-01-05.1 and 54-01-05.2 and all net proceeds of sales must be placed in the national guard training area and facility development trust fund. The adjutant general may lease parts of military installations to any person. Land originally acquired from a county, city, or political subdivision for nominal consideration may be vacated by the adjutant general and conveyed back to the county, city, or political subdivision when the land is no longer necessary for military purposes.

Source:

S.L. 1903, ch. 48, § 2; R.C. 1905, § 1789; S.L. 1907, ch. 174, § 1; 1909, ch. 165, § 66; C.L. 1913, § 2412; S.L. 1935, ch. 213, § 2; 1941, ch. 221, § 70; R.C. 1943, § 37-1003; S.L. 1951, ch. 225, § 1; 1953, ch. 223, § 8; 1957 Supp., § 37-1003; S.L. 1971, ch. 343, § 3; 1991, ch. 379, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2001, ch. 323, § 1.

37-10-03.3.
Use of state funds in the construction of national guard facilities.

The adjutant general may participate with political subdivisions to match federal funds for the construction of national guard facilities by contributing, subject to legislative appropriations, up to fifty thousand dollars for a single unit facility or one hundred thousand dollars for a multiple unit facility, but the state contribution may not exceed the amount provided by political subdivisions.

Source:

S.L. 1903, ch. 48, § 2; R.C. 1905, § 1789; S.L. 1907, ch. 174, § 1; 1909, ch. 165, § 66; C.L. 1913, § 2412; S.L. 1935, ch. 213, § 2; 1941, ch. 221, § 70; R.C. 1943, § 37-1003; S.L. 1951, ch. 225, § 1; 1953, ch. 223, § 8; 1957 Supp., § 37-1003; S.L. 1971, ch. 343, § 4; 1979, ch. 390, § 4.

37-10-03.4.
Contracting officer for construction of national guard facilities.

The adjutant general or the adjutant general’s designee is the contracting officer for the state concerning the construction of national guard facilities. Governing bodies of political subdivisions may, by resolution, also designate the adjutant general or the adjutant general’s designee as their contracting officer for the construction of national guard facilities.

Source:

S.L. 1903, ch. 48, § 2; R.C. 1905, § 1789; S.L. 1907, ch. 174, § 1; 1909, ch. 165, § 66; C.L. 1913, § 2412; S.L. 1935, ch. 213, § 2; 1941, ch. 221, § 70; R.C. 1943, § 37-1003; S.L. 1951, ch. 225, § 1; 1953, ch. 223, § 8; 1957 Supp., § 37-1003; S.L. 1971, ch. 343, § 5; 1979, ch. 390, § 5.

37-10-03.5.
National guard facilities — Maintenance and repair board. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 298, § 1.

37-10-04.
Use of armories by other organizations — Regulations governing.

The use of armories for the regular meetings or functions of patriotic societies or recognized military service organizations holding charters from Congress or incorporated in this state must be granted by the adjutant general or by the officer in charge of any armory at such times and under such circumstances as not to interfere with the use of the armory for military purposes by the company or companies quartered therein. The use of an armory by a society or organization is subject to the rules and regulations in force governing the use of armories.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 221, § 72; R.C. 1943, § 37-1004; S.L. 1971, ch. 343, § 6.

37-10-05.
Bidder’s bond in lieu of certified check. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 390, § 6.

37-10-06.
Transfer of motor storage buildings. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 390, § 6.